nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Sykling > Sykkeldeler > Drivlinjedeler til sykkel > Sykkelvekslere: Styreendegir; Deler og fester til girhendler; Elektroniske girkontrollere; Vrigir; Integrerte bremse- og girhendler; Tommelgir
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 사이클링 > 자전거 부품 > 자전거 동력전달장치 부품 > 자전거 기어 박스: 바엔드 시프터; 자전거 시프터 부품 및 마운트; 전자식 변속기 컨트롤러; 그립 시프터; 일체형 브레이크 및 변속 레버; 트리거 시프터
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 自行车用品 > 自行车零配件 > 自行车传动系统零件 > 自行车变速拨叉: 把端变速器; 自行车变速器零件和底座; 电子变速控制器; 转把变速器; 刹变一体手柄; 拨把变速器
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Biciklizam > Dijelovi za bicikle > Dijelovi pogona bicikla > Mjenjači za bicikle: Mjenjači na krajevima upravljača; Dijelovi i nosači mjenjača za bicikl; Elektronički kontroleri mjenjača; Mjenjači s hvatom; Integrirane ručice kočnice i mjenjača; Mjenjači s okidačem
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Vélo > Pièces détachées vélo > Pièces de transmission de vélo > Leviers de vitesses de vélo: Manettes de bout de guidon; Pièces et supports de manettes de vitesse pour vélo; Contrôleurs de changement de vitesse électronique; Poignées tournantes; Leviers de frein et de vitesse intégrés; Manettes à gâchette
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Езда на велосипеде > Детали для велосипедов > Детали ходовой части велосипедов > Шифтеры для велосипедов: Торцевые манетки (bar-end); Запчасти и крепления для велосипедных манеток; Контроллеры электронных манеток; Манетки типа grip shift; Интегрированные манетки и тормозные ручки (дуалы); Триггерные манетки
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > ปั่นจักรยาน > อะไหล่จักรยาน > ชิ้นส่วนขับเคลื่อนจักรยาน > เกียร์จักรยาน: ชิฟเตอร์ปลายแฮนด์; ชิ้นส่วนและฐานยึดชิฟเตอร์จักรยาน; คอนโทรลเลอร์เกียร์ไฟฟ้า; ชิฟเตอร์แบบบิด; ชิฟเตอร์รวมมือเบรก; ชิฟเตอร์แบบกด
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Ciclism > Piese pentru biciclete > Piese de transmisie pentru biciclete > Schimbătoare pentru biciclete: Schimbătoare de viteze la capătul ghidonului; Componente și suporturi pentru schimbătoarele de viteze; Controlere electronice pentru schimbător de viteze; Schimbătoare de viteze cu rotire din mână; Manete integrate de frână și schimbare a vitezelor; Schimbătoare de viteze cu trăgaci
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Kolarstwo > Części rowerowe > Części do napędów rowerowych > Manetki: Manetki na końce kierownicy; Części i mocowania manetek rowerowych; Elektroniczne manetki; Manetki obrotowe; Klamkomanetki; Manetki cynglowe
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Kolesarjenje > Kolesarski deli > Deli pogonskega sklopa koles > Prestave za kolo: Prestavne ročice na koncu krmila; Deli in nosilci za menjalnike koles; Elektronski krmilniki prestav; Vrtljive prestavne ročice; Integrirane zavorne in prestavne ročice; Sprožilne prestavne ročice
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > サイクリング > 自転車パーツ > 自転車駆動系パーツ > 自転車ギアシフター: バーエンドシフター; 自転車用シフターパーツ・マウント; 電動シフターコントローラー; グリップシフター; ブレーキ・シフト一体型レバー; トリガーシフター
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Fietsen > Fietsonderdelen > Fietstandwielonderdelen > Fietsversnellingen: Barend-shifters; Onderdelen en bevestigingen voor fietsshifters; Elektronische shiftercontrollers; Gripshifters; Geïntegreerde rem- en schakelhendels; Triggershifters
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Pyöräily > Polkupyörän osat > Polkupyörän voimansiirron osat > Polkupyörän vaihdevivut: Aika-ajovaihtajat; Vaihdevipujen osat ja kiinnikkeet; Elektronisten vaihteiden ohjaimet; Kiertovaihtajat; Yhdistetyt jarru- ja vaihdevivut; Liipaisinvaihtajat
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Ciclismo > Peças de bicicleta > Peças de transmissão de bicicletas > Alavanca de marchas para bicicletas: Trocadores bar-end; Peças e suportes de trocador de bicicleta; Controladores de câmbio eletrônico; Trocadores grip shift; Alavancas de freio e câmbio integradas; Trocadores tipo gatilho
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Cycling > Bicycle Parts > Bicycle Drivetrain Parts > Bicycle Shifters: Bar-End Shifters; Bicycle Shifter Parts & Mounts; Electronic Shifter Controllers; Grip Shifters; Integrated Brake & Shift Levers; Trigger Shifters
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Ciclismo > Piezas para bicicletas > Piezas de cadenas para bicicletas > Palancas de cambio para bicicletas: Palancas de cambio de extremo de manillar; Piezas y soportes de palanca de cambios para bicicleta; Controladores de cambio electrónico; Palancas de cambio de puño; Manetas integradas de freno y cambio; Palancas de cambio de gatillo
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Cykling > Cykeldele > Cykeltransmissionsdele > Cykelgearskiftere: Styrskiftere; Dele og beslag til gearskiftere; Elektroniske gearskiftere; Drejegrebsskiftere; Integrerede bremse- og geargreb; Trigger-gearskiftere
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Ciclismo > Peças para bicicleta > Peças de transmissão para bicicleta > Mudanças para bicicleta: Manípulos de mudanças de extremidade de guiador; Peças e suportes de manípulos de mudanças de bicicleta; Controlos eletrónicos de mudanças; Manípulos de mudanças rotativos; Manetes integradas de travões e mudanças; Manípulos de mudanças tipo gatilho
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Radfahren > Fahrradbauteile > Fahrradschaltungsteile > Fahrradschalthebel: Lenkerend-Schalthebel; Teile & Halterungen für Fahrrad-Schalthebel; Elektronische Schaltsteuerungen; Drehgriffschalter; Integrierte Brems- & Schalthebel; Trigger-Schalthebel
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Đạp xe > Phụ tùng xe đạp > Bộ phận truyền động của xe đạp > Tay gạt chuyển số xe đạp: Tay đề gắn gù ghi đông; Phụ tùng & ngàm tay đề xe đạp; Bộ điều khiển tay đề điện tử; Tay đề vặn; Tay phanh & tay đề tích hợp; Tay đề bấm xả
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ποδηλασία > Ανταλλακτικά ποδηλάτου > Ανταλλακτικά μετάδοσης ποδηλάτου > Μανέτες ταχυτήτων ποδηλάτου: Χειριστήρια ταχυτήτων Bar-End; Ανταλλακτικά & βάσεις χειριστηρίων ταχυτήτων ποδηλάτου; Ηλεκτρονικά χειριστήρια ταχυτήτων; Περιστροφικά χειριστήρια ταχυτήτων (Grip); Ενσωματωμένες μανέτες φρένων & ταχυτήτων; Χειριστήρια ταχυτήτων τύπου Trigger
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Bisiklet > Bisiklet Parçaları > Bisiklet Aktarma Organları > Bisiklet Vites Kolları: Gidon ucu vites kolları; Bisiklet vites kolu parçaları ve bağlantı aparatları; Elektronik vites kontrolörleri; Döner vites kolları; Entegre fren ve vites kolları; Tetikli vites kolları
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Bicyklovanie > Diely pre bicykle > Diely hnacieho pohonu bicykla > Prehadzovačky na bicykle: Radenie na konci riadidiel; Diely a držiaky radiacej páky bicyklov; Elektronický radiaci ovládač; Radiace páky; Integrované brzdové a radiace páky; Radenie prevodov páčkami
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Dviračių sportas > Dviračių dalys > Dviračių pavaros dalys > Dviračių pavarų perjungikliai: Vairo galų perjungikliai; Dviračių pavarų perjungiklių dalys ir tvirtinimai; Elektroninių pavarų perjungiklių valdikliai; Rankenų perjungikliai; Integruoti stabdžių ir pavarų svirtys; Svirtiniai pavarų perjungikliai
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Колоездене > Части за велосипеди > Части за задвижване на велосипеди > Команди за велосипед: Лостове за превключване в края на кормилото; Части и стойки за превключватели на велосипеди; Електронни контролери за превключване на скорости; Ръкохватки за превключване на скорости; Интегрирани спирачни и скоростни лостове; Лостчета за превключване на скорости
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Cykling > Cykeldelar > Delar till cykelkedjor > Växelreglage för cyklar: Styrändsreglage; Växelreglagedelar och fästen för cyklar; Elektroniska växelreglage; Vridreglage; Integrerade broms- och växelreglage; Tumreglage
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 單車 > 自行車零件 > 自行車傳動變速零件 > 自行車變速桿: 車把端變速把手; 自行車變速把手零件與固定座; 電子變速控制器; 轉把式變速把手; 整合式煞車變速把手; 撥把式變速把手
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Cyklistika > Díly jízdních kol > Součásti řetězových systémů na kola > Páčky přehazovaček na kola: Řazení do konce řídítek; Díly a objímky řazení; Elektronické ovladače řazení; Otočné řazení; Integrované brzdové a řadicí páky; Páčkové řazení
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Kerékpározás > Kerékpáralkatrészek > Kerékpárhajtáslánc-alkatrészek > Kerékpárváltók: Kormányvég-váltókarok; Kerékpárváltókar-alkatrészek és -konzolok; Elektronikus váltóvezérlők; Markolatváltók; Fékváltókarok; Karos váltókarok
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Ciclismo > Parti per bicicletta > Parti trasmissione bicicletta > Leve cambio per bicicletta: Comandi cambio bar-end; Componenti e supporti per comandi cambio della bicicletta; Controller per comandi cambio elettronici; Comandi cambio a rotazione; Leve del cambio e del freno integrate; Comandi cambio a grilletto